Utah statutes.
31A-8a-204.   Advertising restrictions and requirements.
(1)  An operator of a health discount program may not:
(a)  use any form of words or terms that may confuse health discount programs
with other types of  health insurance in advertising or marketing such as
"health plan," "health benefit plan," "coverage," "copay," "copayments,"
"preexisting conditions," "guaranteed issue," "premium," and "preferred
provider";
(b)  use other terms as designated by the commissioner by administrative rule
in advertisement or marketing that could reasonably mislead a consumer to
believe that a discount health program is any other form of health insurance;
or
(c)  refer to sales representatives as "agents," "producers," or
"consultants."
(2)  A health discount program operator:
(a)  must have a written agreement with any marketer of the health discount
program prior to marketing, selling, promoting, or distributing the health
discount programs;
(b)  must file with the commissioner all advertisement, marketing materials,
brochures, and discount programs prior to their use or distribution; and
(c)  must make the following disclosures:
(i)  in writing in at least 10-point type and bolded; and
(ii)  with any marketing or advertising to the public and with any enrollment
forms given to an enrollee:
(A)  the program is not a health insurance policy;
(B)  the program provides discounts only at certain health care providers for
health care services;
(C)  the program holder is obligated to pay for all health care services but
will receive a discount from those health care providers who have contracted
with the health discount program; and
(D)  the corporate name and the location of the health discount program
operator.
(3)  A health discount program operator or marketer who sells the health
discount program with another product must provide the consumer a written
itemization of the fees of the health discount program separate from any fees
or charges for the other product, which can be purchased separately.
